Illinois, session 104th, SB1247.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 3-611.6 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-611.6 new)7    Sec. 3-611.6. Volunteer firefighter license plates.8    (a) The Secretary, upon the receipt of a request from a 9municipality or fire protection district that operates a fire 10department accompanied by an application and the appropriate 11fee, may issue, to a volunteer firefighter of each municipal 12fire department or fire protection district, special 13registration plates designated as volunteer firefighter 14license plates. The special plates issued under this Section 15shall be affixed only to passenger vehicles of the first 16division or motor vehicles of the second division weighing not 17more than 8,000 pounds that are owned by the fire department or 18a volunteer firefighter of the fire department. Plates issued 19under this Section shall expire according to the multi-year 20procedure established by Section 3-414.1.21    (b) The design and color of the special plates shall be 22wholly within the discretion of the Secretary. The plates are 23not required to designate "Land of Lincoln" as prescribed in   SB1247- 2 -LRB104 05718 LNS 15748 b1subsection (b) of Section 3-412. The Secretary may prescribe 2rules governing the requirements and approval of the special 3plates. The fee for this plate for a vehicle owned by a 4volunteer firefighter shall be the same as the fee prescribed 5for first division vehicles under Section 3-806. Permanent 6license plates for volunteer firefighter vehicles owned by a 7municipal fire department or fire protection district shall be 8issued at the fee prescribed in subsection (b) of Section 93-808.1.